morphophonology/foma/const.lexc
LEXICON Root
tiʔiɬə #;
tsiʔiɬə #;
tiʔiɬ #;
tsiʔiɬ #;
tiʔəʔ #;
tsiʔəʔ #;
ti  #; ! spec:masc
tsi #; ! spec:fem
tə  #; ! nspec:masc
tsə #; ! nspec:fem
ʔə  #;
kʷi #;
kʷsi #;
! ʔa form is subsumed by verbal form, since we're not using glosses (yet)
! ʔa     #; ! interjection
ʔu     #; ! VOC
ʔu     #; ! Q 
ʔi     #; ! "yes"
həbuʔ  #; ! "haboo"

!interjections
hiʔ:hiˑʔ  #;!"come.on"
šəwaʔ     #;!"INTJ"

! demonstratives
tudiʔ  #; ! dist.dma
kʷədiʔ #; ! rem.dma
kʷədiʔ:kʷədi #; ! rem.dma (var)

! type III redups for dets, need to treat as true redup
tiʔ-iʔəʔ:tiʔiʔəʔ #;
tiʔ-iʔiɬ:tiʔiʔiɬ #;


! sconj
gʷəl #;
huy  #;
gʷa  #;

! əlgʷəʔ is an inflection that is written with 
! a space
əlgʷəʔ #;

!foc prtcl
diɬ    #; !"foc"

!proper names
kikiʔalus  #;
xʷiwuʔc    #;
ʔax̌ʷadus   #;
hay̓qid     #; 
La         #;
Conner     #;

!place names
ʔəcəladiʔ #; ! Utsallady 

!adverbs
ʔəbil̕    #; ! "perhaps"
!moved to v for redup ck̓ʷaqid  #;
cick̓ʷ    #; ! "very"
cukʷ     #;
dəb      #; ! "instead"
day̓      #;
diɬ      #; 
diʔɬ     #; ! "suddenly"
dᶻahak̓ʷuʔ #; ! "at.long.last"
haw̓əʔ    #;
hikʷ     #; ! "large"
hiqəb    #; ! "excessively"
hiwil    #; ! "go.ahead"
həlaʔb:laʔb #; !"really" (var)
həlaʔb      #; !"really"
uʔxʷ     #; ! "still"
uʔxʷ:huʔxʷ #; ! "still" (var)
ƛ̕al̕      #; ! "also"
put      #; ! "really"
tiləb    #; ! "immediately"
tux̌ʷ     #; ! "just"
təɬ      #; ! "truly"
x̌ʷul̕     #;
x̌əɬ      #; !"seemingly"
x̌ʷuʔələʔ #; ! "maybe"
yəx̌i     #; ! "because"
yaʔɬ     #; ! "unable"
yaw̓      #; ! "only.if" (note: this meaning isn't in dictionary, has 'go ahead/repeat')
!wh-adverbs
čad      #; ! "where"
čal      #; ! "how/why"
dxʷ-čad:dxʷčad   #; ! "cntrpt-where"
k̓ʷid     #; ! "how.much/many"
ɬiɬ-čad:ɬiɬčad   #; ! "prlv-where"
tul̕-čad:tul̕čad   #; ! "cntrfg-where"

! preposition?
gʷəɬ     #; !"assc"

!deontics
diʔəʔ #;

!adjectives
ləgʷəb #;

!S2 particles
ʔu       #;! ‘interrogative’
dᶻəɬ     #;! ‘seemingly’
əw̓ə      #;! ‘so!’ (mirative)
!kʷaʔ    #;! ‘probably’
k̓ʷəɬ     #;! ‘it is said’ (quotative)
sixʷ     #;! ‘again, as usual’ (exasperation)
uʔxʷ     #;! still, yet
čəd      #;! '1sg'
čəxʷ     #;! '2sg'
!! there's a homophonous verb stem, as long as we do nothing we glosses,
!! we can remove this one with no loss of coverage and lower spurious ambiguity
! čəɬ      #;! '1pl'
čəlap    #;! '2pl'
čələp    #;! '2pl' (var)
ɬi       #;
xʷuʔələʔ #; !"maybe"

! borrowings
town     #;
LaConner #;
McGlenn  #;
Island   #;
islands  #;
little   #;
tree     #;
around   #;
the      #;
fire     #;
round    #;
great    #;
big      #;
girls    #;
boys     #;
anyways  #;
sister   #;
sisters   #;
dirt     #;

! numbers 
dəč̓uʔ  #; !1
diič̓uʔ #; !1:human

! coordinators
čxʷa   #; ! "2sg.coord"
čɬa    #; ! "1pl.coord"
čələpa #; ! "2pl.coord"


! pronouns
dəgʷi  #; !"2sg"
cədiɬ  #; !"3sg"
caadiɬ #; !"3pl"

! special cases
čaʔčəlal̕ #; ! "almost.caught"
sɬə-ɬadəyʔ:sɬəɬadəyʔ   #; ! "pl-woman" (exceptional plural)
tiʔacəc   #;   !"unq"

! need to block other redup on this one
attn-qəl̕adiʔ:qiʔqəl̕adiʔ  #; !""little.up.rooted.tree"
